Tennessee, session 114, HB1034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 50, Chapter 1, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Except as otherwise provided in § 63-6-204(f)(2), a restriction on the right of an
employee or contractor to practice the employee's or contractor's profession upon
termination or conclusion of the employment or contractual relationship is void and
unenforceable in this state.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-1-148, is amended by deleting the
section.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204(f)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting ", except as allowed by § 63-1-148 or any successor section".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204(g)(2), is amended by
deleting ", except as allowed by § 63-1-148 or any successor section".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204(g)(3), is amended by
deleting "Notwithstanding § 63-1-148 or any successor section, in" and substituting instead "In".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-205(c)(2), is amended by
deleting ", except as allowed by § 63-1-148 or any successor section".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-205(c)(3), is amended by
deleting "Notwithstanding § 63-1-148 or any successor section, in" and substituting instead "In".
HB1034
002990
- 1 -

SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-205(f)(2), is amended by
deleting "; provided, such restriction complies with 63-1-148".
SECTION 9. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to contracts entered into or amended on or after that date.
- 2 - 002990